Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska51-809
Title to property; exempt from taxation; when.

The title to property, equipment, and library materials of a public library federation acquired with funds of the public library federation shall be vested in the participating local governing authorities as reflected by an agreement entered into before the formation of the federation. The title to property, equipment, and library materials of an affiliated public library shall remain in the affiliated public library. Removal or disposal of public library federation property shall be determined by the public library federation board. The property of any public library federation shall be exempt from execution and shall be exempt from taxation to the extent such property is used for a public purpose.

Laws 1999, LB 362, § 9;

Laws 2001, LB 173, § 17.